ro-RO: Feronerie > Instalații sanitare > Seturi de reparații instalații sanitare: Seturi de reparații robinete; Seturi de reparații conducte; Seturi de reparații toalete
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 管道 > 管道修理工具包: 水龙头修理工具包; 管子修理工具包; 厕所修理工具包
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Vodoinstalace > Sady na opravy a údržbu potrubí: Sady na opravu baterií; Sady na opravu potrubí; Sady na opravu toalet
pt-BR: Ferragens > Encanamento > Kits para reparos de encanamento: Kits de reparo de torneiras; Kits de reparo de tubos; Kits de reparo de banheiro
hu: Hardver > Vízvezeték > Vízvezetékjavító készletek: Csaptelepjavító készletek; Csőjavító készletek; WC-javító készletek
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Υδραυλικές εγκαταστάσεις > Κιτ επισκευής υδραυλικών εγκαταστάσεων: Κιτ επισκευής βρύσης; Κιτ επισκευής σωλήνων; Κιτ επισκευής τουαλέτας
ko: 철물 > 배관 > 배관 수리 키트: 수전 수리 키트; 파이프 수리 키트; 변기 수리 키트
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Prodotti idraulici > Kit per riparazioni idrauliche: Kit di riparazione rubinetti; Kit di riparazione tubi; Kit di riparazione bagni
pl: Sprzęt > Systemy hydrauliczne > Zestawy do naprawy hydrauliki: Zestawy do naprawy baterii; Zestawy do naprawy rur; Zestawy do naprawy toalety
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Системы водоснабжения и водоотведения > Сантехнические наборы для ремонта: Наборы для ремонта смесителей; Наборы для ремонта труб; Наборы для ремонта унитазов
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Vodovod > Kompleti za popravilo vodovodnih napeljav: Kompleti za popravilo pip; Kompleti za popravilo cevi; Kompleti za popravilo stranišč
en: Hardware > Plumbing > Plumbing Repair Kits: Faucet Repair Kits; Pipe Repair Kits; Toilet Repair Kits
fr: Quincaillerie > Plomberie > Trousses de plomberie: Kits de réparation de robinet; Kits de réparation de tuyaux; Kits de réparation de toilettes
vi: Phần cứng > Đường ống > Bộ dụng cụ sửa chữa ống nước: Bộ dụng cụ sửa chữa vòi nước; Bộ dụng cụ sửa chữa ống; Bộ dụng cụ sửa chữa bồn cầu
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Sanitär > Sanitär-Reparatursätze: Armaturen-Reparaturkits; Rohr-Reparaturkits; Toiletten-Reparaturkits
es: Bricolaje > Fontanería > Kits de reparación para fontanería: Kits de reparación de grifos; Kits de reparación de tuberías; Kits de reparación de inodoros
ja: DIY用品 > 水道設備 > 配管修理キット: 蛇口修理キット; パイプ修理キット; トイレ修理キット
tr: Hırdavat > Sıhhi tesisat > Boru Tamir Malzemeleri: Musluk Tamir Takımları; Boru Tamir Takımları; Tuvalet Tamir Takımları
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Santechnika > Santechnikos remonto rinkiniai: Maišytuvų remonto rinkiniai; Vamzdžių remonto rinkiniai; Tualetų remonto rinkiniai
pt-PT: Equipamento > Canalização > Kits de reparação de canalização: Kits de reparação de torneiras; Kits de reparação de tubos; Kits de reparação de sanita
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Loodgieterswerk > Reparatiesets voor loodgieterswerk: Reparatiesets voor mengkranen; Reparatiesets voor leidingen; Reparatiesets voor toiletten
bg-BG: Железария > Водоснабдяване и канализация > ВиК комплекти за ремонт: Комплекти за ремонт на смесители; Комплекти за ремонт на тръби; Комплекти за ремонт на тоалетни
da: Isenkram > Sanitet > Rørreparationssæt: Vandhanereparationssæt; Rørreparationssæt; Toiletreparationssæt
sk-SK: Náradie > Vodoinštalačné práce > Súpravy na opravu vodovodného potrubia: Súpravy na opravu batérií; Súpravy na opravu potrubí; Súpravy na opravu toaliet
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > ระบบท่อประปา > ชุดซ่อมแซมท่อ: ชุดซ่อมแซมก๊อกน้ำ; ชุดซ่อมท่อ; ชุดซ่อมโถส้วม
zh-TW: 硬體 > 管線 > 水管維修工具組: 水龍頭修理工具包; 管線修理工具包; 馬桶修理工具包
nb: Maskinvare > Rørlegging > Reparasjonssett for sanitæranlegg: Reparasjonssett for vask; Reparasjonssett for rør; Reparasjonssett for toaletter
sv: Metallprodukter > Rörmokeri > Reparationskit - rörmokeri: Reparationsenheter för kranar; Rörreparationsenheter; Toalettreparationsenheter
hr-HR: Željezarija > Vodoinstalaterska oprema > Kompleti za popravak vodovodnih instalacija: Kompleti za popravak slavina; Kompleti za popravak cijevi; Kompleti za popravak toaleta
fi: Rakentaminen > Putkityöt > Putkikorjaussetit: Hanan korjaussetit; Putken korjaussarjat; WC:n korjaussarjat